North Carolina, session 2025, HB196.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The North
Carolina Museum of Life and Science, Inc., to create a new biotechnology exhibit and laboratory
to showcase North Carolina's biotechnology achievements and promote interest in STEM
careers.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H196-v-1*